Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.195.100

Notifications—Appeals.

The administrator of a private school approved under this chapter must comply with the notification provisions of RCW 28A.320.163 that apply to superintendents, designees of superintendents, and principals.

[ 2020 c 167 s 2.]